inc/V-CLASS_AW_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - sçáawaa - ENGLISH : # CLASS_AW_STEM_2

     sçáw+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sçáawaa
     sçáw+V+INDIRECT+PAST: sçáawaan
     sçáw+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sçáawaas
     sçáw+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sçáawaa.ang
     sçáw+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: sçáaw'ahlanggang
     sçáw+V+CERTAIN+PAST: sçáaw'ahlanggan
     sçáw+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: sçáaw'ahlanggiinii
     sçáw+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: sçáaw'ahlans
     sçáw+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: sçáawaa'ahlang
     sçáw+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: sçáawaa'ahlanggaa
     sçáw+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: sçáawaa'ahlanggang
     sçáw+V+REFLEXIVE: sçáaw'ahl
